Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202079-2104.04
Learning community coordinating council; members; duties.

Each learning community coordinating council shall be required to select at least two members to meet with the advisory committee and learning community administrators at least twice annually to discuss the community achievement plan, results of evaluations conducted with learning community or school district funds, best practices for improving achievement, particularly for students with achievement obstacles, learning community programs, and other matters related to improving education for students within the learning community and throughout the state.

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 63.